Idaho, session 2026, H0558.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 16, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 25, Title 16, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 25
FEDERAL BENEFITS FOR CHILDREN IN CUSTODY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND
WELFARE
16-2501. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of health and welfare and its au-
thorized agents.
(2) "Representative payee" means a person or organization appointed by
a federal agency to receive federal benefits on behalf of a child.
16-2502. FEDERAL BENEFITS PROVIDED TO CHILDREN IN THE LEGAL CUSTODY OF
THE DEPARTMENT -- ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATIONS. (1) Within sixty (60) days af-
ter a child enters the department's legal custody, and annually thereafter,
the department shall determine whether the child is currently receiving or
eligible to receive federal benefits administered by the social security ad-
ministration or the department of veterans affairs, including survivor ben-
efits or dependent benefits.
(2) If it is determined that a child in the legal custody of the depart-
ment is already receiving federal benefits, the department shall:
(a) In consultation with the child and the child's attorney, identify
the child's representative payee consistent with federal law; or
(b) Apply to become the child's representative payee if no other suit-
able candidate is available.
(3) If the department determines that the child is eligible for federal
benefits, the department shall:


(a) Apply for those benefits on behalf of the child; and
(b) If no other candidate is available, apply to become the child's rep-
resentative payee.
16-2503. OBLIGATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT WHEN ACTING AS REPRESENTATIVE
PAYEE. If the department is appointed to serve as the representative payee of
a child in the legal custody of the department, the department shall:
(1) Establish and maintain an appropriate account to use and conserve
the child's federal benefits for current unmet needs and future needs pur-
suant to the requirements of the funding source and any applicable asset and
resource limits;
(2) Annually review whether another qualified person, other than the
department, could assume the role of representative payee and could better
serve that role. If another qualified person is identified, the department
shall assist in transferring the role of representative payee to such per-
son; and
(3) Provide an annual accounting of the use, application, or conserva-
tion of the child's federal benefits to the child, the child's attorney, the
child's guardian, and the child's parents if parental rights have not been
terminated.
16-2504. PROHIBITED USE OF FEDERAL BENEFITS. (1) If the department is
the child's representative payee, the department shall not use a child's
federal benefits to pay for or reimburse the department or the state of Idaho
for any costs of the child's care, maintenance, supervision, or services.
(2) The department may use such benefits to pay for the child's unmet
needs beyond what the department is obligated, is required, or has agreed to
pay.
16-2505. NOTICE AND APPEAL. (1) The department shall notify the child,
the child's attorney, the child's guardian, and the child's parents, if
parental rights have not been terminated, in writing of any application,
decision, or appeal related to the child's federal benefits.
(2) In providing notice of the denial of benefits, the department shall
consult with the child and the child's attorney and appeal the denial if it is
in the child's best interest.
16-2506. MILESTONE DISBURSEMENT OF FEDERAL BENEFITS. If the depart-
ment is appointed to serve as the representative payee of a child in the legal
custody of the department, the department shall:
(1) Develop and implement a success sequence savings and disbursement
plan for each child with conserved earned benefits. Under the plan the child
may access a portion of the child's benefits upon completion of specific
milestones that promote independence and financial readiness. Such mile-
stones may include:
(a) Obtaining a driver's license or state identification card;
(b) Receiving a high school diploma or a recognized equivalent;
(c) Enrolling in a postsecondary education, vocational training, or
apprenticeship program;


(d) Maintaining verified employment for at least six (6) consecutive
months; and
(e) Completing a department-approved financial literacy or saving
readiness program;
(2) Determine reasonable disbursement thresholds and amounts for each
milestone; and
(3) Before the child leaves the custody of the department, ensure that
the child has access to financial literacy and planning tools.
16-2507. RELEASE OF REMAINING FEDERAL BENEFIT FUNDS UPON TERMINATION
OF LEGAL CUSTODY. If the department is the child's representative payee,
upon termination of the department's legal custody of a child, the depart-
ment shall release any remaining funds to:
(1) The child, if the child is at least eighteen (18) years of age or
emancipated; or
(2) The child's parent or guardian, if the child is younger than eigh-
teen (18) years of age and is not emancipated.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.